Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Wounded Warrior Special Programs

§ 49-7-351.
Wounded warrior special programs: establishment of special seasons within wildlife management areas and refuges for hunting, fishing and other recreational activities for eligible veterans and active duty service members.

The purpose of this section is to honor wounded veterans and active duty service members by providing hunting, fishing and other recreational opportunities for them in state wildlife management areas and wildlife refuges.

As used in this section, the term:

“Active duty” means full-time duty in the Armed Forces, Reserves or National Guard during wartime service as defined by the United States Congress.

“Armed Forces” means the United States Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force and Coast Guard.

“National Guard” means the Army National Guard and the Air Force National Guard of the United States.

“Reserves” means the Army Reserve, Navy Reserve, Marine Corps Reserve, Air Force Reserve and Coast Guard Reserve.

The Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks may designate an area or areas or establish special seasons within wildlife management areas and wildlife refuges for hunting, fishing and other recreational activities for eligible veterans and active duty service members to be known as “Wounded Warrior Special Programs.”

The designated areas or special seasons shall be open to a person who:

Is an active duty member of the Armed Forces, National Guard or Reserves and has a combat-related physical injury as determined by the member’s branch of service; or

Is a veteran member of the Armed Forces, National Guard or Reserves who served on active duty during a period of war as defined by the United States Congress, and:

Has a service-connected physical disability as determined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or

Was discharged or released from military service because of a physical disability acquired or aggravated while serving on active duty during a period of war.

The department may allow one (1) person to accompany an eligible veteran or active duty service member who requires assistance to hunt, fish or participate in the recreational activity.

The commission may adopt any rules and regulations deemed necessary to administer this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.